California statutes. Business and Professions Code
If the licensed operator who is designated as the qualifying manager for a registered company ceases for any reason whatsoever to be connected with the company, the company shall notify the registrar in writing within 10 days from such cessation. If the notice is given the registration shall remain in force for a reasonable length of time, to be determined by rules of the board, during which period the company must submit to the registrar in writing the name of another qualified, or to be qualified, qualifying manager to replace the qualifying manager who has ceased to be connected with it, and who shall qualify as such within the time allowed by rules and
 regulations of the board.

If the company fails to notify the registrar within the 10-day period, or fails to replace with a qualifying manager within the period fixed by the regulations of the board, at the end of the period the registration shall be ipso facto suspended. The registration shall be reinstated upon the filing of an affidavit, executed by a representative of the company, and filed with the registrar, to the effect that the qualifying manager who ceased to be connected with the company has been replaced by another operator who is authorized by this chapter to act in such capacity, and that such operator has not had his or her license suspended or revoked or that he or she has not been connected with a company which has had its registration suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 45.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8572.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may, in its sole discretion, issue a probationary license to an applicant subject to terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to issue a probationary license, the board shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The board shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the board.

(c) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or licensee.

(d) For purposes of issuing a probationary license to qualified new applicants, the board shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary license.

(2) A process to obtain a standard license for applicants who were issued a probationary license.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Renewal of Licenses [8590. - 8593.2.]

8590.

(a) Except as otherwise provided herein, an operator’s, field representative’s, and applicator’s licenses shall expire at 12 midnight on June 30 of the third year from the date of issue.

(b) An individual licensed in more than one category may request that each license expire on the same date. The date requested shall be the date of the earliest expiration.

(c) An operator, field representative, and applicator shall pay a fee for the renewal of his or her license.

(d) The board shall on or before the first day of June of each year mail to each operator,
 field representative, and applicator whose license will expire in that year, addressed to him or her at his or her last known address, a notice that his or her renewal fee is due and payable and that, if not paid by June 30, a penalty will be added thereto.

(e) In no case shall the penalty be waived.

(f) Upon the receipt of the fee the board shall cause the renewal certificate to be issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 25.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8591.

If delinquency in the payment of the fee for renewal of any license extends beyond three months, the license shall not be reinstated and the licensee shall be required to obtain a new license in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 8560).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8592.

Any licensee whose license is under suspension may make application for renewal of his or her license as provided in this article, but the board may not renew his or her license until the suspension has been lifted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8593.

(a) The board shall require as a condition to the renewal of each operator’s and field representative’s license that the holder submit proof satisfactory to the board that they have informed themselves of developments in the field of pest control either by completion of courses of continuing education in pest control approved by the board or equivalent activity approved by the board.

(b) The board shall develop a correspondence course or courses with any educational institution or institutions as it deems appropriate. This course may be used to fulfill the requirements of this section. The institution may charge a reasonable fee for each course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 19.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8593.1.

The board shall require as a condition to the renewal of each applicator’s license that the holder thereof submit proof satisfactory to the board that they have completed courses of continuing education in pesticide application and use approved by the board or equivalent activity approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 20.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8593.2.

Commencing July 1, 2016, a licensee shall comply with the training requirements of the Healthy Schools Act of 2000 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 17608) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.5 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code and Article 17 (commencing with Section 13180) of Chapter 2 of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code) if the licensee intends to apply a pesticide at a schoolsite, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 17609 of the Education Code. Courses completed in furtherance of the training requirements of the Healthy Schools Act of 2000 shall count toward the continuing education requirements of the board and shall qualify as continuing education in integrated pest management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Regulation of Licensees [8610. - 8619.]

8610.

(a) Every company that engages in the practice of structural pest control, as a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other organization or any combination thereof, shall be registered with the Structural Pest Control Board. Each application for a company registration shall include the name of the company’s owner if it is a sole proprietorship, the names of the partners, if it is a partnership, or the names of its officers and shareholders with 10 percent or more ownership interest, if it is a corporation, and the address of the company’s principal office in this state.

(b) (1) A company registration shall not be issued to an applicant that has an officer, director, qualifying manager, responsible managing employee, or an individual who otherwise exercises dominion or control over the company, whose license or registration is revoked or suspended at the time of the application as the result of disciplinary action pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A company registration shall not be issued to an applicant that has an officer, director, qualifying manager, responsible managing employee, or an individual who otherwise exercises dominion or control over the company, who owns or has owned in the past more than a 10 percent interest in another sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other organization that has its license or registration revoked or suspended at the time of the application as the result of disciplinary action pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Each registered company shall designate an individual or individuals who hold an operator’s license to act as its qualifying manager or managers. The qualifying manager or managers must be licensed in each branch of pest control in which the company engages in business. The designated qualifying manager or managers shall supervise the daily business of the company and shall be available to supervise and assist all employees of the company, in accordance with regulations which the board may establish.

(d) No individual who holds an operator’s license shall act as a qualifying manager for more than two registered companies.

(1) Any individual, who on January 1, 2008, is acting as the qualifying manager for more than two registered companies shall comply with this subdivision by January 1, 2010.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2010, failure to comply with this subdivision shall result in the disassociation of the qualifying manager and the automatic suspension of the company’s registration.

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to a company engaging in the practice of structural pest control as a corporation and which has an additional company or companies operating under that corporation and doing business in a name other than the corporation name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8611.

(a) Each branch office shall have a branch supervisor designated by the registered company to supervise and assist the company’s employees who are located at that branch. The branch supervisor shall be an individual who is licensed by the board as an operator or a field representative in the branch or branches of business being conducted
 and his or her license shall be prominently displayed in the branch office.

(b) If a branch supervisor ceases for any reason to be connected with a registered company, the company shall notify the registrar in writing within 10 days from that cessation. If this notice is given, the company’s branch office registration shall remain in force for a reasonable length of time to be determined by rules of the board, during which period the company shall submit to the registrar in writing the name of another qualified branch supervisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 37.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.

(a) The licenses of qualifying managers and company registrations shall be prominently displayed in the registered company’s office, and no registration issued hereunder shall authorize the company to do business except from the location for which the registration was issued. Each registered company having a branch office or more than one branch office shall be required to display its branch office registration prominently in each branch office it maintains.

(b) When a registered company opens a branch office it shall notify the registrar on a form prescribed by the board and issued by the registrar in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board. The notification shall
 include the name of the individual designated as the branch supervisor and shall be submitted with the fee for a branch office prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 28.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8613.

A registered company which changes the location of its principal office or any branch office or which changes its qualifying manager, branch supervisor, officers, sole proprietors, partners, or its bond or insurance shall notify the registrar on a form prescribed by the board of that change within 10 days thereafter. A fee for filing those changes shall be charged in accordance with Section 8674.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 11.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.

The Director of Pesticide Regulation shall be designated by the board as its agent for the purposes of carrying out Section 8616.4. The board and the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall jointly develop a training program specifically relating to the various aspects of structural pest control and train all county agricultural commissioners and other personnel involved in structural pest control investigations and enforcement. No disciplinary action pursuant to Section 8617 may be taken by a county agricultural commissioner until training has been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.4.

The Director of Pesticide Regulation shall designate county agricultural commissioners as his or her representatives to carry out the provisions of Sections 8616.5, 8616.7, and 8617. The Director of Pesticide Regulation shall enter into a contract specifying their responsibilities and providing for reimbursement in accordance with Section 8505.17.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.5.

(a) The county agricultural commissioner shall be the lead agency for inspections and routine investigations of pesticide use by the board licensees and registered companies, and of persons engaged in unlicensed structural pest control. When a matter is referred to the board for action, the board shall be the lead agency and may require that the commissioner assist in any investigation.

(b) The board and the Director of Pesticide Regulation shall jointly develop the list of the types of investigations to be conducted by the commissioner that may result in the suspension of a license or company registration, or the imposition of a fine, pursuant to Section 8617 and the list of the types of violations that the commissioner shall refer to the board for disciplinary action.

(c) As used in subdivision (a), the term “routine investigations” means all investigations of pesticide misuse by a board licensee or registered company except (1) investigation of misuse incidents that are referred to the board for disciplinary action or that are the basis for county actions to suspend or fine structural pest control licensees or registered companies in accordance with the lists promulgated pursuant to subdivision (b), or (2) any investigation performed by the county agricultural commissioner that has been requested by the board and involves exclusively a violation of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 306, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.6.

The Director of Pesticide Regulation shall be notified by the board when it determines that persons acting pursuant to Sections 8616 and 8616.4 have not fulfilled their responsibilities under this chapter in a specific county or counties. The notice to the Director of Pesticide Regulation, which shall be dealt with in a timely manner, shall specifically list the actions which caused the filing of the notice. If the notice is not dealt with in a manner satisfactory to the board, the board may then suspend the activities of its agent pursuant to Section 8616.5, who is subject to the notice in the specific county or counties for which the notice was filed for a period not to exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.7.

When a county agricultural commissioner is acting, pursuant to Section 8616.4, only the commissioner may conduct inspections and routine investigations pursuant to Section 8616.5 and take disciplinary action pursuant to Section 8617. Except as otherwise provided, nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or excluding the assistance provided to the board by the Division of Investigation under Sections 155 and 159.5 other than by board personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1266, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.9.

(a) If an employee is found during an inspection or investigation not wearing personal protective equipment required by label or regulation, the commissioner may refer the violation by the employer for statewide disciplinary action by the board or suspend the right of the employer to work in the county for up to three working days. If the commissioner does neither, the commissioner may assess an administrative fine against both the employer and the employee. If the commissioner takes no action against the employer for this violation, the commissioner may assess an administrative fine against the employee if the employer provides evidence of all of the following: 

(1) The employer
 has a written training program, has provided training to the employee, and has maintained a record of training as required by label or regulation.

(2) The employer provided personal protective equipment required by label or regulation, the equipment was available at the site when the employee was handling the pesticide or pesticides, and the equipment was properly maintained and in good working order.

(3) The employer is in compliance with regulations relating to the workplace and supervision of employees.

(4) The employer has documented implementation and adheres to a written company policy of disciplinary action for employees who violate company policy or state or local laws or regulations.

(5) The employer has not been disciplined or assessed an
 administrative fine for a violation of the personal protective equipment requirement for the previous two years.

(b) (1) An administrative fine assessed against an employer pursuant to this section shall not be less than seven hundred dollars ($700) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). An administrative fine assessed against an employee pursuant to this section shall not be less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) In assessing an administrative fine pursuant to this section, the board or commissioner shall consider the appropriateness of the amount of the fine to the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the licensee, and the history of prior violations.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of the
 commissioner to take action against the employee pursuant to Section 8617, including suspension of the employee’s license or referral of the violation for statewide disciplinary action by the board pursuant to Section 8620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 359, Sec. 2.   (AB 2529)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.

(a) The board or county agricultural commissioners, when acting pursuant to Section 8616.4, may suspend the right of a structural pest control licensee or registered company to work in a county for up to three working days or, for a licensee, registered company, or an unlicensed individual acting as a licensee, may levy an administrative fine up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or direct the licensee to attend and pass a board-approved course of instruction at a cost not to exceed the administrative fine, or both, for each violation of this chapter or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 8698), or any regulations adopted pursuant to these chapters, or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14001), Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 14101), or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15201) of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code, or any regulations adopted pursuant to those chapters, relating to pesticides. However, any violation determined by the board or the commissioner to be a serious violation as defined in Section 1922 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Fines collected shall be paid to the Education and Enforcement Account in the Structural Pest Control Education and Enforcement Fund. Suspension may include all or part of the registered company’s business within the county based on the nature of the violation, but shall, whenever possible, be restricted to that portion of a registered company’s business in a county that was in violation.

(b) A licensee who passes a course pursuant to this section shall not be awarded continuing
 education credit for that course.

(c) Before a suspension action is taken, a fine levied, or a licensee is required to attend and pass a board-approved course of instruction, the person charged with the violation shall be provided a written notice of the proposed action, including the nature of the violation, the amount of the proposed fine or suspension, or the requirement to attend and pass a board-approved course of instruction. The notice of proposed action shall inform the person charged with the violation that if he or she desires a hearing before the commissioner issuing the proposed action to contest the finding of a violation, that hearing shall be requested by written notice to the commissioner within 20 days of the date of receipt of the written notice of proposed action.

(d) A notice of the proposed action that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the
 person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or the notice is not accepted at that address.

(e) If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the commissioner’s evidence and a right to present evidence on his or her own behalf. If a hearing is not requested within the prescribed time, the commissioner may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(f) If the person upon whom the commissioner imposed a fine or suspension or required attendance at a board-approved course of instruction requested and appeared at a hearing before the commissioner, the person may appeal the commissioner’s decision to the Disciplinary Review Committee and shall be subject to the procedures in Section 8662.

(g) If a suspension or fine is ordered, it may not take effect until 20 days after the date of the commissioner’s decision if no appeal is filed. If an appeal pursuant to Section 8662 is filed, the commissioner’s order shall be stayed until 30 days after the Disciplinary Review Committee has ruled on the appeal.

(h) Failure of a licensee or registered company to pay a fine within 30 days of the date of assessment or to comply with the order of suspension, unless the citation is being appealed, may result in disciplinary action being taken by the board.

(i) If a citation containing a fine is issued to a licensee and it is not contested or the time to appeal the citation has expired and the fine is not paid, the full amount of the assessed fine shall be added to the fee for renewal of that license. A license shall not be
 renewed without payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(j) If a citation containing a fine is issued to a registered company and it is not contested or the time to appeal the citation has expired and the fine is not paid, the board shall not sell to the registered company any pesticide use stamps until the assessed fine has been paid.

(k) If a citation containing the requirement that a licensee attend and pass a board-approved course of instruction is not contested or the time to appeal the citation has expired and the licensee has not attended and passed the required board-approved course of instruction, the licensee’s license shall not be renewed without proof of attendance and passage of the required board-approved course of instruction.

(l) Once final action pursuant to this section is taken, no other
 administrative or civil action may be taken by any state governmental agency for the same violation. However, action taken pursuant to this section may be used by the board as evidence of prior discipline, and multiple local actions may be the basis for statewide disciplinary action by the board pursuant to Section 8620. A certified copy of the order of suspension or fine issued pursuant to this section or Section 8662 shall constitute conclusive evidence of the occurrence of the violation.

(m) If the board is the party issuing the notice of proposed action to suspend or impose a fine pursuant to subdivision (a), “commissioner” as used in subdivisions (c), (f), and (g) includes the board’s registrar.

(n) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced by the commissioner within two years of the occurrence of the violation. If a commissioner submits a completed
 investigation to the board for action by the registrar or the Attorney General, the action shall be commenced within one year of that submission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 30.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.5.

Regulations adopted pursuant to Section 11503 of the Food and Agricultural Code are not applicable to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 766, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8618.

Documents as specified by regulation must be maintained by all registered companies for three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8619.

(a) An inspection tag shall be posted whenever an inspection for wood destroying pests or organisms is made.

(b) If the registered company completes any work with respect to wood destroying pests or organisms, it shall post a completion tag next to the inspection tag, unless both the inspection and completion tags are combined on the same form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 12.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Disciplinary Proceedings [8620. - 8666.]

8620.

The board may upon its own motion, and shall upon verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any individual acting as a licensee, or making application for a license.

After a hearing, the board may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke a license issued under this chapter if the holder, while a licensee or applicant, is guilty of or commits any one or more of the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action. In addition to its authority to suspend or revoke a license, the board may assess a civil penalty as follows:

(a) Upon the conclusion of a hearing held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, if the proposed decision of the hearing officer is that the licensee is guilty of or has committed any one of the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action, the proposed decision shall provide for the imposition of a suspension or for the revocation of the license. In this case, the board may impose the suspension or revocation. The board may also, in lieu of a suspension, assess a civil penalty. The licensee may express a preference for a form of discipline, but the board shall not be bound by any expression of preference.

If a licensee elects to stipulate to a disciplinary action prior to an administrative hearing, the board may impose a civil penalty, in accordance with this section, in lieu of suspension.

If a proposed stipulation is rejected by the board, it is null and void and does not constitute an admission of any violation charged.

(b) The civil penalty shall not be more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for an actual suspension of one to 19 days.

(c) The civil penalty shall not be more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for an actual suspension of 20 to 45 days.

(d) If a licensee is assessed the civil penalty in lieu of an actual suspension, the penalty shall be paid before the effective date of the decision.

(e) If the civil penalty is not paid before the effective date of the suspension, the license shall be suspended until the penalty is paid or until the actual suspension is served.

No civil penalty shall be assessed in lieu of any suspension which exceeds 45 days. With the exception of the proceedings on suspensions undertaken or on fines levied pursuant to Section 8617, the proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

In any order of suspension or revocation, the board may authorize the completion of any contract or work contracted for under terms and conditions set forth in the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8621.

A complaint of any person against a nonlicensee, licensee, or registered company shall be filed with the board no later than two years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action or, in a matter involving fraud, gross negligence, or misrepresentation, no later than four years after commission of the act or omission. The board shall file any accusation no later than 18 months after the complaint has been filed with the board, except that with respect to a violation of Section 8637, the accusation may be filed no later than two years after the discovery by the board of the alleged facts constituting the
 fraud or misrepresentation prohibited by the section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (AB 1590)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8622.

(a) When a complaint is accepted for investigation of a registered company, the board, through an authorized representative, may inspect any or all properties on which a report has been issued pursuant to Section 8516 or a notice of completion has been issued pursuant to Section 8518 by the registered company to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations issued thereunder. If the board determines the property or properties are not in compliance, a notice shall be sent to the registered company so stating. The registered company shall have 30 days from the receipt of the notice to bring the property into compliance, unless an extension is authorized by the board, and it shall submit a new original report
 or completion notice or both and an inspection fee of not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for each property inspected. If a subsequent reinspection is necessary, pursuant to the board’s review of the new original report or notice or both, a commensurate reinspection fee shall also be charged. If the board’s authorized representative makes no determination or determines the property is in compliance, no inspection fee shall be charged.

(b) The notice sent to the registered company shall inform the registered company that if it desires a hearing to contest the finding of noncompliance, the hearing shall be requested by written notice to the board within 20 days of receipt of the notice of noncompliance from the board. If a hearing is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any assessment shall not constitute an admission of any noncompliance charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 31.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8623.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8620 or any other provision of law, the board may revoke, suspend, or deny at any time a license under this chapter on any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided in this chapter. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The board may deny a license to an applicant on any of the grounds specified in Section 480.

(c) In addition to the requirements provided in Sections 485 and 486, upon denial of an application for a license, the board
 shall provide a statement of reasons for the denial that does the following:

(1) Evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any.

(2) Provides the board’s criteria relating to rehabilitation, formulated pursuant to Section 482, that takes into account the age and severity of the offense, and the evidence relating to participation in treatment or other rehabilitation programs.

(3) If the board’s decision was based on the applicant’s prior criminal conviction, justifies the board’s denial of a license and conveys the reasons why the prior criminal conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensed structural pest control operator.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2009, all of the following shall
 apply:

(1) If the denial of a license is due at least in part to the applicant’s state or federal criminal history record, the board shall, in addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), provide to the applicant a copy of his or her criminal history record at an address specified by the candidate.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(B) The criminal history record shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the applicant’s criminal history record and the criminal history record shall not be made available by the board to any employer.

(C) The board shall retain a
 copy of the applicant’s written request and a copy of the response sent to the applicant, which shall include the date and the address to which the response was sent.

(2) The board shall make that information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 487, the board shall conduct a hearing of a license denial within 90 days of receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing. For all other hearing requests, the board shall determine when the hearing shall be conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 13.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8623.5.

(a) A person whose license or registration has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of the penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed, beginning on the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license revoked or surrendered.

(2) At least two years for modification of a condition of probation.

(3) At least one year for early termination of a probation of less than three
 years.

(4) At least two years for early termination of a probation of three years or more.

(b) The board may require an examination for reinstatement of a license revoked or surrendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 14.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8624.

If the board suspends or revokes an operator’s license and one or more branch offices are registered under the name of the operator, the suspension or revocation may be applied to each branch office.

If the operator is the qualifying manager, a partner, responsible officer, or owner of a registered structural pest control company, the suspension or revocation may be applied to the company registration.

The performance by any partnership, corporation, firm, association, or registered company of any act or omission constituting a cause for disciplinary action, likewise constitutes a cause for disciplinary action against any licensee who, at the time the act or omission occurred, was the qualifying manager, a partner, responsible officer, or owner of the partnership, corporation, firm, association, or registered company whether or not he or she had knowledge of, or participated in, the prohibited act or omission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

8625.

The lapsing or suspension of a license or company registration by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, or the voluntary surrender of a license or company registration shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceeding against such licensee or company, or to render a decision suspending or revoking such license or registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 60.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8632.

The suspension or revocation of a license or a company registration as in this chapter provided may also be ordered in any action otherwise proper in any court involving the licensee’s or a company’s performance of a legal obligation as a licensee or registrant under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 61.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8635.

Departure from, or disregard of, plans or specifications in the performance of structural pest control work in any material respect, without consent of the owner or his duly authorized representative, is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

8636.

Disregard and violation of the buildings laws of the state, or of any of its political subdivisions, or of the safety laws, labor laws, health laws, or compensation insurance laws of the state relating to the practice of structural pest control is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8637.

Misrepresentation of a material fact by the applicant in obtaining a license or company registration is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 62.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8638.

Failure on the part of a registered company to complete any operation or construction repairs for the price stated in the contract for such operation or construction repairs or in any modification of such contract is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 63.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8639.
